District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Proficient Procurement Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of
2005, effective October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.01 et seq.), is
amended by adding a new section 2356 to read as follows:
“Sec. 2356. Procurement exemption for vehicle and technology purchases.
“(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, an agency is excused from the
certified business enterprise and small business enterprise requirements to procure vehicles or
technology, if:
“(1) There is insufficient market capacity for the vehicle or technology sought,
such that the goods are not reasonably available through a certified business enterprise at a
comparable price, performance level, or delivery timeline;

“(2) Through procurement from a certified business enterprise, an agency would
forgo a reasonable benefit attainable only through the purchase of the vehicle or technology
directly from the manufacturer, vendor, or supplier; or
“(3) The procurement is necessary to meet an operational, local, or federal
compliance requirement.
“(b) An agency subject to the PPRA shall maintain accurate records of all procurements
exempted by this section and include a report of such records in their annual procurement
accountability filings to the Office of Contracting and Procurement.
“(c) An agency exempt from the PPRA shall maintain accurate record of all
procurements exempted by this section and submit such records to the Council by December 31
of each year, aggregated by:
“(1) Procurements under $250,000; and
“(2) Procurements exceeding $250,000.
“(d) For the purposes of this section, the terms:
“(1) Agency” means a department, office, board, commission, authority, or other
instrumentality of the District government.
“(2) “Technology” means computer and communication technology products,
services, or tools, including, the Internet and other communications networks, cellular devices,
software applications, data systems and storage, and other electronic content.
“(3) “PPRA” means Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8,
2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-351.01 et seq.).
“(4) “Vehicle” means an automobile or motorcycle classified for on-highway
operation, electric vehicles, hybrid vehicles, or other alternative-fuel fleet vehicles.”.

Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).